Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-310 Surplus lines broker license
required; application and qualifications for license. (a) No person shall
procure any contract of surplus lines insurance with an unauthorized insurer
unless the person is licensed as a surplus lines broker.

(b) A person applying for a surplus lines
broker license shall apply to the commissioner on the uniform application and
declare under penalty of denial, suspension, or revocation of the license that
the statements made in the application are true, accurate, and complete to the
best of the applicant's knowledge and belief. Before approving the
application, the commissioner shall find that the applicant:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Has not committed any act that is a ground for a
licensure sanction set forth in section 431:8-317;

(3) Has paid the applicable fees set forth in section
431:7-101;

(4) Has passed, within the two years immediately
preceding the date of the application or issuance of the license, whichever is
later, the applicable examination; and

(5) Has submitted a full set of fingerprints,
including a scanned file from a hard copy fingerprint, for the commissioner to
obtain and receive national and state criminal history records checks from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Hawaii criminal justice data center,
pursuant to section 846-2.7.

(c) The commissioner may require any documents
reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application.

(d) The commissioner shall issue a surplus
lines broker license to any producer licensed under article 9A, except
producers licensed under section 431:9A-107(a)(1), (2), or (5), when the
producer has:

(1) Remitted the annual license fee to the
commissioner as provided in article 7; and

(2) Submitted a completed license application on a
form furnished by the commissioner.

(e) A surplus lines broker license shall be
inactivated if the licensee fails to pay any required fee or penalty. A
surplus lines broker who allows the surplus lines broker's license to become
inactive for nonpayment of the renewal fee may reinstate that license without
the necessity of a written examination; provided that the surplus lines broker:

(1) Pays the fee and a penalty in the amount of fifty
per cent of the then unpaid fees within twenty-four months from the
inactivation date; and

(2) Is in compliance with all requirements of chapter
431.

The license shall automatically expire if the
surplus lines broker does not reinstate the surplus lines broker's license
within the twenty-four month period.

(f) Business entities shall be eligible to be
surplus lines brokers, upon meeting the following conditions:

(1) The business entity licensee shall list
individuals within the business entity who have satisfied all requirements of
this part to become surplus lines brokers;

(2) Only those individuals listed on the business
entity's license shall transact surplus lines business; and

(3) A natural person licensed as a surplus lines
broker shall be identified as the business entity's designated representative.

(g) Licensing procedure, duration, and related
matters shall be governed by article 7. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c
205, §13; am L 2002, c 155, §17; am L 2004, c 122, §26; am L 2006, c 154, §9;
am L 2009, c 77, §7; am L 2012, c 66, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next